Missouri, session 2026, SB1475.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.085, 140.110, 140.160, 140.850,
and 141.260, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.085, 140.110,
140.160, 140.850, and 141.260, to read as follows:
137.085. 1. Government lands entered or located on
prior to the first day of January shall be taxable for that
year and every year thereafter; school and swamp land and
lots shall become taxable whenever the county sells, conveys
or agrees to convey its title.
2. (1) Real property shall in all cases be liable for
the taxes thereon, and a lien is hereby vested in favor of
the state on all real property for all taxes thereon, which
lien shall accrue and become a fixed encumbrance as soon as
the amount of the taxes is determined by assessment and
levy, and said lien shall be enforced as provided by law;
said lien shall continue to be enforced until all taxes,
forfeitures, back taxes and costs shall be fully paid or the
land sold or released as provided by law.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1475 2
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, no county or other political subdivision of this
state shall relinquish the authority to enforce the state's
lien and collect delinquent taxes or assessments to any
other entity.
140.110. 1. The collectors of the respective counties
shall collect the taxes contained in the back tax book. Any
person interested in or the owner of any tract of land or
lot contained in the back tax book may redeem the tract of
land or town lot, or any part thereof, from the state's lien
thereon, by paying to the proper collector the amount of the
original taxes, as charged against the tract of land or town
lot described in the back tax book together with interest
from the day upon which the tax first became delinquent at
the rate specified in section 140.100.
2. Any payment for personal property taxes received by
the county collector shall be accepted and first be applied
to the oldest of any back delinquent personal taxes on the
back tax book before a county collector accepts any payment
for all or any part of personal property taxes due and
assessed on the current tax book.
3. Any payment for real property taxes received by the
county collector shall be accepted and first be applied to
the oldest of any back delinquent taxes on the same
individual parcel of real estate on the back tax book before
a county collector accepts payment for real property taxes
due and assessed on the current tax book.
4. Subsection 3 of this section shall not apply to
payment for real property taxes by financial institutions,
as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which
they service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24,
Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal Regulations.

SB 1475 3
140.160. 1. (1) No proceedings for the sale of land
and lots for delinquent taxes or unpaid special assessments
pursuant to this chapter, relating to the collection of
delinquent and back taxes and unpaid special assessments and
providing for foreclosure sale and redemption of land and
lots therefor, shall be commenced until the expiration of a
seven year period beginning on the date such taxes and
special assessments become delinquent. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, no additional penalties or
interest shall be assessed against such lands or lots during
such seven year period.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to any delinquent property with an assessed value that is
less than the amount of the lien of the state as of the most
recent reassessment, and the sale of such delinquent
property may commence pursuant to this chapter without
regard for the seven year period provided in subdivision (1)
of this subsection.
2. No proceedings for the sale of land and lots for
delinquent taxes pursuant to this chapter or unpaid special
assessments, relating to the collection of delinquent and
back taxes and unpaid special assessments and providing for
foreclosure sale and redemption of land and lots therefor,
shall be valid unless initial proceedings therefor shall be
commenced within three years after [delinquency of such
taxes and unpaid special assessments] the expiration of the
seven year period provided for in subsection 1 of this
section, and any sale held pursuant to initial proceedings
commenced within such period of three years shall be deemed
to have been in compliance with the provisions of said law
insofar as the time at which such sales are to be had is
specified therein; provided further, that in suits or

SB 1475 4
actions to collect delinquent drainage and/or levee
assessments on real estate such suits or actions shall be
commenced within three years after [delinquency] the
expiration of the seven year period provided for in
subsection 1 of this section, otherwise no suit or action
therefor shall be commenced, had or maintained, except that
the three-year limitation described in this subsection shall
not be applicable if any written instrument conveys any real
estate having a tax-exempt status, if such instrument causes
such real estate to again become taxable real property and
if such instrument has not been recorded in the office of
the recorder in the county in which the real estate has been
situated. Such three-year limitation shall only be
applicable once the recording of the title has occurred.
[2.] 3. The county auditor in all counties having a
county auditor shall annually audit collections, deposits,
and supporting reports of the collector and provide a copy
of such audit to the county collector and to the governing
body of the county. A copy of the audit may be provided to
all applicable taxing entities within the county at the
discretion of the county collector.
140.850. 1. For all taxes administered by the
department of revenue, the director may enter into contracts
with private attorneys or professional collection agencies
for the collection of delinquent taxes owed by residents or
nonresidents of the state of Missouri; except that, any
contract let pursuant to this section shall be awarded in
the manner prescribed by chapter 34 and shall be subject to
appropriation made therefor. Any contract entered into
pursuant to this section shall not provide for a collection
fee in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount collected.

SB 1475 5
2. Neither the director of revenue nor any other state
or county official shall enter into any contract with a
private attorney or professional collection agency for the
collection of delinquent property taxes owed by residents or
nonresidents of the state of Missouri.
141.260. 1. Whenever it shall appear that a tax bill
has been due and unpaid for a period of at least [two] seven
years after the date on which, if a general tax bill, it
became delinquent, or, if a special tax bill, such bill or
any installment thereof became due, the tax lien,
represented by such tax bill, and the tax liens of other
delinquent tax bills, shall be summarily foreclosed in the
manner provided in sections 141.210 to 141.810.
2. Ownership of a tax bill, or of a tax sale
certificate, or certificate of purchase, or tax deed, or any
other instrument or record of a tax bill not bearing
evidence of cancellation or payment, by the tax district or
taxing authority issuing the same, or by any other owner
thereof, shall be prima facie evidence of the fact that the
tax bill or tax lien represented thereby has not been paid
to the tax district or to the owner of the tax bill or tax
lien.
3. The holders of tax sale certificates, certificates
of purchase, or tax deeds, issued by any municipality, shall
be on a parity as to priority of liens and shall have the
same rights as the taxing authorities holding or owning
general tax bills for the same tax year, and may in like
manner foreclose their liens under sections 141.210 to
141.810.
Section B. Because of the importance of protecting
property rights in this state, section A of this act is
deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the

SB 1475 6
public health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby
declared to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and section A of this act shall be in full
force and effect upon its passage and approval.
✓